Idaho, session 2026, S1322.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 34-1114, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-1114. AFFIDAVIT IN LIEU OF PERSONAL IDENTIFICATION. If a voter is
not able to present personal identification as required in section 34-1113,
Idaho Code, the voter may complete an affidavit in lieu of the personal iden-
tification. The affidavit shall be on a form prescribed by the secretary
of state and shall require the voter to provide the voter's name, and ad-
dress, and either the voter's date of birth or the voter's Idaho driver's
license or identification card number. The voter shall sign the affidavit.
The judges of election shall verify the information against the voter reg-
istration records prior to issuing a ballot. Any person who knowingly pro-
vides false, erroneous, or inaccurate information on such affidavit shall be
guilty of a felony.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.